Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-176
Task force; review; report.

The task force shall conduct a review of the plans, specifications,
and other construction and repair documents and ongoing maintenance requirements
for real property, structures, or improvements that may be proposed to be
made available to any state agency, board, or commission by means of gift,
bequest, or devise and any acquisition of real property or structures by any state agency, board, or commission with
the proceeds of donations, gifts, bequests, devises, or
grants from individuals, organizations, corporations, foundations, or similar
entities or from nonfederal governmental agencies, if the combined proceeds
of such donations, gifts, bequests, devises, or grants exceed two hundred
fifty thousand dollars, pursuant to section 81-1108.33. The task
force shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the Committee
on Building Maintenance.

Laws 1999, LB 369, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB264, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB761, § 1.